District of Columbia statutes.
47-3201

Repealed

Definitions.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-58, § 101, 24 DCR 5765
Aug. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-137, § 2, 29 DCR 2757
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Aug. 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-142, § 3(i), 45 DCR 4826
1981 Ed., § 47-3201.
1973 Ed., § 47-3101.
Section 6(b) of D.C. Law 4-137 provided that the provisions of the act shall take effect on the first day of the first month which begins more than 30 days after August 14, 1982, or on October 1, 1982, whichever is later.